Hawaii statutes.
§501-214 Judgments, how satisfied.
When there are defendants other than the director of finance, and where
judgment is entered for the plaintiff against the director and against some or
all of the other defendants, execution shall issue against the other defendants
and be levied upon them. If the execution is returned unsatisfied in whole or
in part, and the officer returning the same certifies that the amount due
cannot be collected from the lands or goods of the other defendants, the
circuit court rendering the judgment shall direct the clerk to certify to the
governor the amount due on the execution, and the governor shall draw the
governor's warrant therefor upon the director, and the director shall pay the
amount out of the general fund, without any further act making an appropriation
therefor.

When in the action judgment for any reason
cannot be entered against all or any of the other defendants, it may be entered
against the director alone, or against the director and such of the other
defendants as are found to be liable, and against whom judgment can lawfully be
entered. Whenever judgment is entered against the director alone, whether in a
case where the director is sole defendant or joint defendant with others, the
circuit court before which the action is tried shall cause the clerk to
transmit to the governor a certificate of the entry of judgment and of the
amount due, and the director shall pay the same upon the warrant of the
governor, as above provided. [L 1903, c 56, §98; RL 1925, §3288; am L 1932 2d,
c 33, §3; RL 1935, §5101; RL 1945, §12701; RL 1955, §342-101; am L Sp 1959 2d,
c 1, §14; am L 1963, c 114, §1; HRS §501-214; am L 1972, c 91, §1(oo); gen ch
1985]

Case Notes

Cited: 42 H. 661, 664, modifying 41 H. 490, app. dism'd 267
F.2d 449.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next